Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.16.030

Scope of inspection right.

(1) A shareholder's agent or attorney has the same inspection and copying rights as the shareholder.

(2) The corporation may, if reasonable, satisfy the right to copy records under *RCW 23B.16.020 by furnishing copies by photocopy or other means chosen by the corporation, including furnishing copies through an electronic transmission.

(3) The corporation may impose a reasonable charge, covering the costs of labor and material, for copies of any documents provided to the shareholder. The charge may not exceed the estimated cost of production or reproduction of the documents.

(4) The corporation may comply with a shareholder's demand to inspect the record of shareholders under RCW 23B.16.020(2)(c) by providing the shareholder with a list of its shareholders that was compiled no earlier than the date of the shareholder's demand.

[ 2020 c 57 s 75. Prior: 1989 c 165 s 184.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "section 184 of this act" has been translated to "RCW 23B.16.020." A literal translation would be "RCW 23B.16.030" which is the section above and appears to be erroneous.